Washington statutes.
RCW 41.16.170

Payment on death of firefighter with no dependents.

Whenever a firefighter dies leaving no widow or widower or children, the amount of his or her accumulated contributions, plus accrued compounded interest only, shall be paid his or her beneficiary.

[ 2007 c 218 s 33; 1973 1st ex.s. c 154 s 67; 1959 c 5 s 11; 1957 c 82 s 11. Prior: 1947 c 91 s 8, part; 1935 c 39 s 5; 1929 c 86 s 6, part; 1919 c 196 s 8, part; 1909 c 50 s 8, part; Rem. Supp. 1947 s 9578-47, part.]

NOTES:

Intent—Finding—2007 c 218: See note following RCW 41.08.020.

Severability—1973 1st ex.s. c 154: See note following RCW 2.12.030.